Utah statutes.
41-6a-1104.   Persons on bicycles, mopeds, skates, and sleds not to attach
to moving vehicles -- Exception.
(1)  A person riding a bicycle, moped, coaster, skate board, roller skates,
sled, or toy vehicle may not attach it or a person to any moving vehicle on a
highway.
(2)  This section does not prohibit attaching a trailer or semitrailer to a
bicycle or moped if that trailer or semitrailer has been designed for
attachment.
